Utah statutes.
58-60-205.   Qualifications for licensure or certification as a clinical or
certified social worker, certified social worker intern, and social service
worker.
(1)  An applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall:
(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  produce certified transcripts from an accredited institution of higher
education recognized by the division in collaboration with the board verifying
satisfactory completion of an education and earned degree as follows:
(i)  an earned master's degree in social work resulting from completion of an
education program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; or
(ii)  an earned doctoral degree in social work that results from successful
completion of a clinical concentration and practicum approved by the division
and defined by rule under Section 58-1-203;
(e)  have completed a minimum of 4,000 hours of clinical social work training
as defined by division rule under Section 58-1-203 in not less than two years
and under the supervision of a clinical social worker supervisor approved by
the division in collaboration with the board;
(f)  document successful completion of not less than 1,000 hours of supervised
training in mental health therapy obtained after completion of the education
requirement in Subsection (1)(d), which training may be included as part of
the 4,000 hours of training in Subsection (1)(e), and of which documented
evidence demonstrates not less than 100 of the hours were obtained under the
direct personal face to face supervision of a clinical social worker approved
by the division in collaboration with the board;
(g)  have completed a case work, group work, or family treatment course
sequence with a clinical practicum in content as defined by rule under Section
58-1-203; and
(h)  pass the examination requirement established by rule under Section
58-1-203.
(2)  An applicant for licensure as a certified social worker shall:
(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  produce certified transcripts from an accredited institution of higher
education recognized by the division in collaboration with the Social Worker
Licensing Board verifying satisfactory completion of an education and an
earned degree as follows:
(i)  a social work education program accredited by the Council on Social Work
Education and an earned master's degree resulting from completion of that
program; or
(ii)  an education program that contains approved clinical social work
concentration and practicum in content as defined by rule under Section
58-1-203 and an earned doctorate resulting from completion of that program;
and
(e)  pass the examination requirement established by rule under Section
58-1-203.
(3) (a)  An applicant for certification as a certified social worker intern
shall meet the requirements of Subsections (2)(a), (b), (c), and (d).
(b)  Certification under Subsection (3)(a) is limited to the time necessary to
pass the examination required under Subsection (2)(e) or six months, whichever
occurs first.
(c)  A certified social worker intern may provide mental health therapy under
the general supervision of a clinical social worker.
(4)  An applicant for licensure as a social service worker shall:
(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  produce certified transcripts from an accredited institution of higher
education recognized by the division in collaboration with the Social Worker
Licensing Board verifying satisfactory completion of an earned degree
resulting from education as follows:
(i)  a bachelor's degree in a social work program accredited by the Council on
Social Work Education;
(ii)  a master's degree in a field approved by the division in collaboration
with the social worker board;
(iii)  a bachelor's degree in sociology, psychology, family sciences, or other
field approved by the division in collaboration with the Social Worker
Licensing Board and also documentation of 2,000 hours of supervised social
work activity approved by the division in collaboration with the board, which
is performed after completing bachelor's degree requirements under this
Subsection (4);
(iv)  a bachelor's degree in any field, if the applicant has completed:
(A)  the equivalent of three credit hours of course work or other approved
training in full-life human growth behavior, abnormal psychology, social work
values and ethics, social welfare, or social welfare policy;
(B)  an approved social work practice methods course; and
(C)  one year of qualifying experience under the supervision of a licensed
certified or clinical social worker, which experience is approved by the
division in collaboration with the Social Worker Licensing Board, and which is
performed after completion of the requirements to obtain the bachelor's degree
required under this Subsection (4); or
(v)  successful completion of the first academic year of a Council on Social
Work Education approved master's of social work curriculum and practicum; and
(e)  pass the examination requirement established by rule under Section
58-1-203.
